Utah statutes.
57-8-21.   Acquisition through tax deed or foreclosure of liens.

In the event any person shall acquire, through foreclosure, exercise of power of sale, or other enforcement of any lien, or by tax deed, the interest of any unit owner, the interest acquired shall be subject to all the provisions of this act and to the covenants, conditions and restrictions contained in the declaration, the condominium plat, the bylaws, the house rules, or any deed affecting the interest then in force.

